Utah statutes.
76-9-104.   Failure to disperse.
(1) A person is guilty of failure to disperse when he remains at the scene of
a riot, disorderly conduct, or an unlawful assembly after having been ordered
to disperse by a peace officer.
(2)  This section shall not apply to a person who attempted to but was unable
to leave the scene of the riot or unlawful assembly.
(3)  Failure to disperse is a class C misdemeanor.
